Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Revision of title. —

Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1, revised this title, amending and renumbering §§

10-1-101

through

10-6-104

as §§

10-1-101

through

10-6-104

. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1978 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they will be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 2, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict herewith.”